California, session 20252026, AB1274.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature find and declares all of the following:(1) The plastic reclaiming industry is vital for reducing plastic waste and promoting environmental sustainability.(2) A closed-loop recycling system ensures that plastic materials are continuously reused, reducing the need for virgin plastic production and minimizing environmental impact.(3) Supporting the plastic reclaiming industry and closed-loop recycling will create jobs, stimulate economic growth, and protect California’s natural resources.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation to implement policies to encourage the use of in-state collected plastic beverage container materials for reuse in manufacturing and packaging in state.